apertium-mar.mar.dix
			<e>       	<p><l>म्हणताना</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="adv"/><s n="impf"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>म्हणतांना</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="adv"/><s n="impf"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>

			<!-- gerund -->
			<e>       	<p><l>म्हणाल्या</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="perf"/><j/></r></p><par n="__post_verbal"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>म्हटल्या</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="perf"/><j/></r></p><par n="__post_verbal"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>म्हणाल्या</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="perf"/><j/></r></p><par n="__post_verbal_no_clit"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>म्हटल्या</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="perf"/><j/></r></p><par n="__post_verbal_no_clit"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>म्हणाल्या</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="perf"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>म्हटल्या</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="perf"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>

			<e>       	<p><l>म्हणण्या</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="__post_verbal"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>म्हणण्या</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="__post_verbal_no_clit"/></e>
			<e>       	<p><l>म्हणण्या</l><r>म्हणणे<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="__sg_case"/></e>

			<!-- adjectival forms -->
			<e>       	<p><l>म्हणालेल</l><r>म्हणालेला<s n="gpr"/><s n="perf"/><j/></r></p><par n="__gpr_suff"/></e>
			<e r="LR">	<p><l>म्हटलेल</l><r>म्हटलेला<s n="gpr"/><s n="perf"/><j/></r></p><par n="__gpr_suff"/></e>

			<!-- r problems -->
			<e>       	<p><l>म्हणणा</l><r>म्हणणारा<s n="gpr"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="__gpr_gen"/></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="म्हणजे__vblex">
			<e> 		<p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="sp"/><j/></r></p><par n="__emph"/></e>
		</pardef>

		<pardef n="__cmpvb_copula">
			<e><p><l>क</l><r>क</r></p><par n="क/र__vblex" /></e>
			<e><p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="/हो__vblex" /></e>
			<e><p><l></l><r></r></p><par n="/आहे__vaux" /></e>
		</pardef>

		<e lm="तयार"> 					<i>तयार<b/></i><par n="__cmpvb_copula" /></e>
		<e lm="सुरू"> 					<i>सुरू<b/></i><par n="__cmpvb_copula" /></e>
		<e lm="प्राप्त"> 				<i>प्राप्त</i><par n="__cmpvb_copula" /></e>
		<e lm="स्थापन"> 				<i>स्थापन<b/></i><par n="__cmpvb_copula" /></e>
		<e lm="आधारित"> 				<i>आधारित<b/></i><par n="__cmpvb_copula" /></e>
		<e lm="सादर"> 					<i>सादर<b/></i><par n="__cmpvb_copula" /></e>
		<e lm="सुरू"> 					<i>सुरू<b/></i><par n="__cmpvb_copula" /></e>
		<e lm="व्यक्त"> 				<i>व्यक्त<b/></i><par n="__cmpvb_copula" /></e>
		<e lm="आयोजित"> 				<i>आयोजित<b/></i><par n="__cmpvb_copula" /></e>
		<e lm="नष्ट"> 					<i>नष्ट<b/></i><par n="__cmpvb_copula" /></e>
		<e lm="घोषित"> 				<i>घोषित<b/></i><par n="__cmpvb_copula" /></e>
		<e lm="चर्चा"> 				<i>चर्चा<b/></i><par n="__cmpvb_copula" /></e>
		<e lm="म्हणजे"> 					<i>म्हणजे</i><par n="म्हणजे__vblex" /></e>
